North Carolina, session 2025, SB586.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 110-91 reads as rewritten:
"§ 110-91. Mandatory standards for a license.
All child care facilities shall comply with all State laws and federal laws and local ordinances
that pertain to child health, safety, and welfare. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the
standards in this section shall be complied with by all child care facilities. However, none of the
standards in this section apply to the school-age children of the operator of a child care facility
but do apply to the preschool-age children of the operator. Children 13 years of age or older may
receive child care on a voluntary basis provided all applicable required standards are met. The
standards in this section, along with any other applicable State laws and federal laws or local
ordinances, shall be the required standards for the issuance of a license by the Secretary under
the policies and procedures of the Commission except that the Commission may, in its discretion,
adopt less stringent standards for the licensing of facilities which provide care on a temporary,
part-time, drop-in, seasonal, after-school or other than a full-time basis.
…
(2) Health-Related Activities. –
…
j. Allergies. – Each child care facility shall observe the following
requirements with respect to allergies:
1. Require each caregiver to receive training on the
administration of epinephrine.
2. Require emergency services to be contacted immediately in the
event that epinephrine is administered.
3. Require notification to the parent or guardian of a child to
whom epinephrine has been administered of a possible allergic
reaction, including all known or potential causes of the
reaction, immediately after the epinephrine has been
administered and emergency services has been contacted.
4. Adopt, and provide a copy to parents of, food service policies
that address and limit exposure to known or common food
allergies.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S586-v-1*